Washington statutes.
RCW 19.178.090

Means for continuation of closing business location prohibited.

No person may conduct a going out of business sale if any means have been established for continuation of the closing business location by the same owner, directly or indirectly, by corporation, trust, unincorporated association, partnership, or other legal entity under the same name or under a different name.

[ 1993 c 456 s 11.]